Georgia, session 2025_26, HB920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Hate-Free Heroes Act."
SECTION 2.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Public safety officials play a critical role in maintaining trust, security, and fairness in
diverse communities;
H. B. 920
- 1 -

LC 60 0157
(2) Membership in hate groups undermines the principles of equality, dignity, and respect
required for such roles; and
(3) Prohibiting recent members of hate groups from serving in public safety positions
strengthens community trust and upholds democratic values.
SECTION 3.
Chapter 8 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to employment and
training of peace officers, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"35-8-8.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Hate group' means an organization that promotes or engages in hatred, violence, or
discrimination against individuals based on race, ethnicity, religion, gender, sexual
orientation, or other protected characteristics.
(2) 'State militia role' means any member of the organized militia as defined in Code
Section 38-2-2.
(3) 'Voluntary associate' means, with respect to a hate group's activities, active
participation, formal affiliation, financial support, or public endorsement.
(b)(1) Any person who has been a voluntary associate of a hate group within the past ten
years is prohibited from serving as a peace officer or in a state militia role.
(2) Any person currently serving as a peace officer or in a state militia role who is found
to have been a hate group member within the past ten years shall be subject to immediate
investigation and potential removal from his or her position.
(c) In addition to the requirements set forth in Code Section 35-8-8, all applicants for
peace officer roles and state militia roles shall undergo comprehensive background checks,
including screening for whether such applicants have been voluntary associates of a hate
group. The council shall oversee compliance of such screening requirements, establish and
maintain a list of identified hate groups, and update screening protocols as necessary.
H. B. 920
- 2 -

LC 60 0157
(d)(1) An individual may appeal a finding of hate group affiliation by providing evidence
to the council demonstrating:
(A) His or her departure from the group and disavowal of its principles; and
(B) Actions taken to counteract or rectify harm caused by his or her past affiliation.
(2) The council shall have the discretion to approve appeals on a case-by-case basis.
(e) Annual reports detailing the enforcement of this Code section shall be published by the
council, including:
(1) The number of individuals denied peace officer roles and state militia roles based on
hate group affiliation;
(2) Appeals filed and outcomes of such cases; and
(3) Updates to the list of identified hate groups."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 920
- 3 -